District of Columbia statutes.
34-1256.04

Insurance.

(a)

At all times during the term of a franchise, including the time for removal of facilities, the cable operator shall hold a valid liability insurance policy and shall pay all premiums for the policy in a timely manner. The policy shall insure the District, its officers, boards, commissions, elected officials, agents, contractors, and employees against liabilities. The policy shall be issued by a company carrying a rating by Best of not less than “A” and the company shall be authorized by the District’s Superintendent of Insurance to do business in the District.

(b)

The amount of the liability insurance policy, and the terms of the policy, shall be established in the franchise agreement.

(c)

The form of the liability insurance policy shall be acceptable to the Director of the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel.

(d)

The policy shall require 30 calendar days written notice of any cancellation to both the Office and the cable operator. If the Office or the cable operator receives a cancellation notice, the cable operator shall obtain a new bond, meeting the requirements of this section, within 30 days after receipt of the notice by the Office or the cable operator.

(e)

The cable operator shall file with the Office written evidence of payment of premiums and executed duplicate copies of the liability insurance policy.

(f)

Failure to comply with the provisions of this section, or with the liability insurance provisions of the franchise agreement, shall constitute a material violation of a franchise.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 604
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2072(h), 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 “Director of the Mayor's Office of Legal Counsel” for “Corporation Counsel” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2072(h) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).